en: Omelette with lardoons
fr: Omelette aux lardons

en: Omelette with mushrooms, Mushroom Omelette
fr: Omelette aux champignons
hr: Omlet s gljivama
lt: Omletai su grybais

en: Eggs, Bird eggs
bg: Яйца
ca: Ous, Ous d'au
cs: Vejce
da: Æg
de: Vogeleier, Vogelei, Eier, Ei
es: Huevos
fi: munat
fr: Œufs, Oeufs, Œufs d'oiseau
he: ביצים
hr: jaja
hu: Tojások
it: Uova
ja: 卵
lt: Kiaušiniai, Paukščių kiaušiniai
nl: Vogeleieren
pl: Jaja, Jajka
pt: Ovos, Ovos de aves
ru: Яйцо птицы, Яйцо, Яйца
sv: Ägg
tr: Yumurta
zh: 鸟蛋, 蛋

en: Fresh eggs
bg: Пресни яйца
ca: Ous frescos
de: Frische Eier, frische Hühnereier
es: Huevos frescos
fi: tuoreet munat
fr: Œufs frais, Oeufs frais
hr: svježih jaja
it: Uova fresche
lt: Švieži kiaušiniai
nl: Verse eieren
pt: Ovos frescos
ru: Сырые яйца
zh: 鲜鸡蛋

en: Boiled eggs
bg: Варени яйца
de: Gekochte Eier, Gekochte Hühnereier
es: Huevos cocidos
fi: Keitetyt munat
fr: Œufs durs, Oeufs durs
hr: Kuhana jaja
ja: 茹で卵, ゆで卵
lt: Virti kiaušiniai
nl: Gekookte eieren
zh: 水煮蛋

en: Free-range chicken eggs, free-range eggs
bg: Яйца от свободно отглеждани кокошки, яйца от кокошки от свободно отглеждане
de: Eier aus Freilandhaltung
es: Huevos de gallinas camperas
fi: Ulkokananmunat
fr: Œufs de poules élevées en plein air, Oeufs plein air
hr: Kokošja jaja slobodnog uzgoja
it: Uova da galline allevate all'aperto
lt: Laisvai laikomų vištų kiaušiniai
nl: Scharreleieren, Eieren van kippen met vrije uitloop
sv: Ägg från frigående höns

en: Barn chicken eggs, barn eggs
bg: Яйца от подово отглеждани кокошки
de: Eier aus Bodenhaltung
fi: Lattiakanalan munat, Vapaan kanan munat
fr: Œufs de poules élevées au sol, Oeufs de poules élevées au sol
hr: Barn kokošja jaja
it: Uova da galline allevate a terra
lt: Tvarte laikomų vištų kiaušiniai
nl: Scharrelkippen

en: Cage chicken eggs, cage eggs
bg: Яйца от клетъчно отглеждани кокошки
de: Eier aus Käfighaltung
fi: häkkikananmunat
fr: Œufs de poules élevées en cage, Œufs de cage
hr: Kavezna kokošja jaja
it: Uova da galline allevate in gabbie
lt: Narvuose laikomų vištų kiaušiniai
nl: Legbatterij eieren

en: Quail eggs, Quail egg
bg: Пъдпъдъчи яйца
de: Wachteleier, Wachtelei
fr: œufs de cailles, Oeufs de cailles
hr: Prepeličja jaja
id: Telur puyuh
ja: うずらの卵
ko: 메추리알
lt: Putpelių kiaušiniai
nl: kwartelei, kwarteleieren
nn: Vaktelegg
ru: Перепелиные яйца, Яйцо перепёлок
tg: Тухми бедона
th: ไข่นกกระทา
vi: Trứng cút
zh: 鹌鹑蛋

en: Cooked quail eggs
fr: œufs de cailles cuits, Oeufs de cailles cuits

en: Duck eggs
bg: Патешки яйца
de: Enteneier
fr: Oeufs de cane
hr: Pačja jaja
it: Uova d'anatra
ja: アヒルの卵
lt: Ančių kiaušiniai
nl: Eende-ei
ru: Яйца уток, яйца утиные, утиные яйца
zh: 鸭蛋

en: Goose eggs
bg: Гъши яйца
fr: Œufs d'oies, Oeuf d'oie
hr: Guščja jaja
it: Uova d'oca
ja: ガチョウの卵
lt: Žąsų kiaušiniai
ru: Яйца гусей, яйца гусиные, гусиные яйца
zh: 鹅蛋

en: Chicken eggs, Hens' eggs
bg: Кокоши яйца
de: Hühnereier
es: Huevos de gallina
fi: kananmunat
fr: Œufs de poules
he: ביצי תרנגולת
hr: Kokošja jaja
it: Uovo di gallina
ja: 鶏卵
lt: Vištų kiaušiniai
nl: Kippeneieren
pl: Jaja kurze
pt: Ovos de galinha
ru: Яйца куриные, куриные яйца, яйца кур
tr: Tavuk yumurtası
zh: 鸡蛋

en: Frozen chicken eggs
fr: Oeufs de poules congelés

en: Ostrich eggs
fr: Œufs d'autruche
hr: Nojeva jaja
ja: ダチョウの卵
ru: Яйца страусов, яйца страусиные, страусиные яйца

en: Gull eggs
it: Uova di gabbiano

en: Guineafowl eggs
fr: Œufs de pintade

en: Pheasant eggs
fr: Œufs de faisan
hr: Fazanova jaja
it: Uova di fagiano

en: Emu eggs
fr: Œufs d'émeu

en: Turkey eggs
fr: Oeufs de dinde, Oeuf de dinde